Nebraska, session 109, LB472.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB472 LB472
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 3 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Regulatory Management Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Regulatory Management Act:
(1) Agency means each board, commission, department, officer,
division, or other administrative office or unit of the state government
authorized by law to make rules and regulations, except the Adjutant
General's office as provided in Chapter 55, the courts including the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, the Commission of Industrial
Relations, the Legislature, and the Secretary of State with respect to
the duties imposed by the act;
(2) Anecdotal problem means an isolated incident or issue based on
individual cases or specific situations, not indicative of a broader
pattern or systemic deficiency, and typically resolvable through existing
procedures or case-by-case interventions without necessitating new
regulatory requirements;
(3) Cost of compliance means the total estimated financial burden
imposed on individuals or businesses to adhere to regulatory
requirements;
(4) Monetized cost or benefit means those costs or benefits that can
be expressed in monetary terms, such as health benefits leading to a
reduction in health care costs for employees, improvements to market
efficiency due to loss reduction or reduced transaction costs, consumer
savings, licensure and registration fees, legal costs, certification and
education costs, material costs, or opportunity costs related to property
value or usage;
(5) Nonmonetized cost or benefit means those costs or benefits that
cannot be easily quantified in monetary terms, such as costs or benefits
associated with changes in privacy protections, indirect environmental
impacts, changes in how markets are regulated, or changes in security
protocols or requirements;
(6) Regulatory requirement means any action or step that must be
-2-

LB472 LB472
2025 2025
taken or piece of information that must be provided in accordance with
legislation, regulation, guidance, policy, or forms, but does not include
nonbinding statements such as statements concerning only the internal
management of any agency not affecting private rights or procedures,
declaratory rulings, intra-agency or interagency memoranda, or agency
guidance that is not enforceable under the rule of law; and
(7) Systemic failure or problem means a widespread market failure,
government failure, or other issue affecting the functionality or
efficiency of an industry, market, process, or system within the state
that (a) is identified using a coherent and testable theory explaining
why the failure or problem is systemic rather than anecdotal and (b) is
reasonably considered to be possible to resolve or mitigate through
regulatory intervention.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) The Office of Regulatory Management is established,
which shall be under the direct control and supervision of the Director
of Regulatory Management appointed by the Governor to serve at the
pleasure of the Governor.
(b) The Director of Regulatory Management shall exercise the powers
and perform the duties conferred or imposed by the Regulatory Management
Act and perform such other duties as may be required by the Governor. The
director shall be responsible for the overall supervision of the office's
programs and personnel. The office shall serve as an agency whose
services are primarily for the support and regulation of other state
agencies in carrying out their regulatory functions.
(c) The office shall include appropriate staff to carry out the
duties and programs assigned to the office.
(2) The office shall supervise the establishment of a baseline
catalog of regulatory requirements currently in effect and accurately
maintain and publish such catalog in a manner that is fully transparent.
In order to create this catalog:
(a) Each agency shall conduct and communicate to the office an
-3-

LB472 LB472
2025 2025
internal review of all regulatory requirements currently in effect and
update such review at the request of the office or every two years,
whichever is soonest;
(b) Each regulatory requirement shall be listed along with its
governing regulation, statutory authority or requirement, or other
relevant documentation. The catalog shall retain a consistent format to
ensure data efficacy over time;
(c) Agency reviews, pursuant to this subsection, shall be completed
and communicated to the office no later than six months after the
effective date of this act. Thereafter, updates to agency reviews shall
be completed and communicated to the office no later than sixty days
after an update request or at the end of the two-year period described in
this subsection if no update has been requested by the office; and
(d) The office shall publish, in a manner that is fully transparent,
a biennial report showing the change in the number and estimated impact
of regulatory requirements currently enacted by each agency. Such report
shall include an estimated change in cost of compliance for the median
citizen or business of the State of Nebraska.
(3) The office shall collect, analyze, assess, and publish agency
evaluations, reports, needs assessments, or other due diligence related
to new regulatory requirements to ensure best practices are being
utilized in the creation of new requirements. All departments, agencies,
offices, or divisions of the State of Nebraska shall provide the office
with such evaluations, reports, needs assessments, or other due diligence
upon request.
(4) The office shall endeavor to ensure that agencies are (a)
clearly identifying a systemic failure or problem that requires new
regulatory action to solve and not an anecdotal problem that could be
handled on a case-by-case basis, (b) analyzing credible and substantial
empirical evidence to support the agency's identification of a systemic
failure or problem, (c) establishing a clear analysis of the costs and
-4-

LB472 LB472
2025 2025
benefits of new regulatory requirements to be taken to solve a systemic
failure or problem identified by the agency, and (d) adequately
addressing uncertainty about the existence or impact of the systemic
failure or problem identified by the agency.
(5) When establishing an analysis of a regulatory requirement, an
agency shall provide monetized estimates of nonmonetized costs or
benefits when such an estimate is feasible, and quantitative estimates of
nonmonetized effects when such an estimate is not feasible. If neither a
monetized nor a quantitative estimate is feasible for a nonmonetized
cost, agencies shall provide a note within the analysis with qualitative
descriptions of such nonmonetized costs and benefits.
(6) If the office determines that best practices were not used in
identifying a systemic failure or problem and subsequent regulatory
action taken by an agency, the office shall communicate to the agency and
the Governor a request to reevaluate the decision to take regulatory
action based on the best practices established in the Regulatory
Management Act and those further established by the office. The office
shall not consider a statement of statutory authorization to be
sufficient due diligence in the identification of a systemic failure or
problem or as substantial evidence of the need for new regulatory action.
(7) The office shall publish agency evaluations, reports, needs
assessments, or other due diligence provided, as well as the office's
assessment thereof, in a manner that is fully transparent.
(8) If any new regulatory requirement is mandated by statute, such
information shall be included in the information provided to the office
and shall be published in the office's assessment thereof in accordance
with the act.
(9) The office shall not have the authority to authorize or reject
regulatory actions taken by any other agency.
-5-